Missouri, session 2026, SB1411.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
thirteen new sections, to be known as sections 393.2000,
393.2003, 393.2006, 393.2009, 393.2012, 393.2015, 393.2018,
393.2021, 393.2024, 393.2027, 393.2030, 393.2033, and 393.2036,
to read as follows:
393.2000. 1. Sections 393.2000 to 393.2036 shall be
known and may be cited as the "Electrical Choice and
Competition Law".
2. Consistent with the timelines established in
section 393.2006, the provisions of sections 393.2000 to
393.2036 shall govern the sale of electric energy in the
state of Missouri and any provision of law that conflicts
with the provisions of sections 393.2000 to 393.2036 shall
be null and void.
3. For purposes of sections 393.2000 to 393.2036, the
commission shall promulgate rules to implement the
provisions in sections 393.2000 to 393.2036. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with

SB 1411 2
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
393.2003. As used in sections 393.2000 to 393.2036,
the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Aggregation program", a grouping of retail
customers into a buying group to purchase energy generation
services in bulk from a retail electric supplier;
(2) "Anticompetitive conduct" or "discriminatory
conduct", actions by an electric utility that inhibit the
ability of retail electric suppliers to provide electric
supply to retail customers or that create an impression that
any electric supply by an electric utility is superior to
offerings in the competitive market or provides an advantage
to any related retail electric supplier over nonaffiliated
retail electric suppliers;
(3) "Commission", the public service commission of the
state of Missouri;
(4) "Competitive procurement process", an auction or
other competitive process in which wholesale electric
suppliers submit bids to supply electric supply to an
electric utility for purposes of serving default supply
service;
(5) "Competitive transition charge", non-bypassable
charge mechanism for the recovery of transition or stranded
costs by an electric utility over a limited time period;

SB 1411 3
(6) "Default supply service", electric supply service
provided by an electric utility, or a non-utility entity
selected by the commission, upon transition to a competitive
market for customers who do not choose a retail electric
supplier;
(7) "Delivery service rates", the charges for the
delivery or transmission of electric power or energy;
(8) "Dual bill", an invoicing framework in which a
retail customer receives a bill from a retail electric
supplier that includes charges for electric supply services
and another bill from the electric utility for transmission
and distribution services;
(9) "Electric supply" or "electric supply services",
the sale or purchase of electricity by a retail customer
from a retail supplier or from a default supply service
provider;
(10) "Electric utility" or "investor-owned utilities",
an electrical corporation as defined in section 386.020.
"Electric utility" or "investor-owned utilities" shall not
include municipally owned electric utilities operating under
chapter 91 or rural electric cooperatives operating under
chapter 394, but such municipally owned or rural electric
cooperatives may choose to opt in to a competitive retail
market pursuant the provisions of sections 393.2000 to
393.2036;
(11) "Energy assistance customers", residential
customers who are eligible for energy billing assistance due
to their income level and who are enrolled in an energy
assistance program;
(12) "Hourly prices", charges for default supply
service that vary hour to hour and are determined from

SB 1411 4
wholesale market prices using a methodology approved by the
commission;
(13) "Independent system operator", an independent and
federally regulated entity that coordinates regional
transmission to ensure non-discriminatory access to the
electric grid and a reliable electricity system;
(14) "Large commercial and industrial customer", a
customer receiving transmission and distribution service
from an electric utility under a non-residential tariff and
whose maximum registered peak load is one thousand kilowatt
or greater within the last twelve months;
(15) "Market power", a company's ability to manipulate
the market clearing price of an item by manipulating the
level of supply, demand, or both;
(16) "Medium commercial or industrial customer", a
customer receiving transmission and distribution service
from the electric utility under a non-residential tariff and
whose maximum registered peak load is one hundred fifty or
more kilowatt, but less than one thousand kilowatt, within
the last twelve months;
(17) "Non-bypassable", a charge that all customers
must pay irrespective of their energy supplier;
(18) "Rate unbundling", the process of separating the
cost components of delivery services from electric supply
services in the electric utility tariffs;
(19) "Residential customer", a customer receiving
transmission and distribution service from the electric
utility under a residential tariff;
(20) "Retail customer", a customer purchasing electric
supply from an electric utility supplier or from a retail
electric supplier;

SB 1411 5
(21) "Retail electric supplier", a person or entity
licensed by the commission to furnish electric supply to
retail customers;
(22) "Small commercial or industrial customer", a
customer receiving transmission and distribution service
from an electric utility under a non-residential tariff and
whose maximum registered peak load is less than one hundred
fifty kilowatt within the last twelve months;
(23) "Supplier consolidated bill", an invoicing
framework in which a single bill is provided to a retail
customer by a retail electric supplier that includes charges
for electric supply services and transmission and
distribution services;
(24) "Transition costs" or "stranded costs", costs by
100 electric utilities that are not recoverable in a competitive
101 generation market. Such costs include electric generation
102 related assets and other deferred charges, the unfunded
103 portion of nuclear decommissioning costs, environmental
104 expenses previously incurred, cost obligations under long-
105 term contracts, and consumer education and other costs
106 associated with implementing electric choice, in addition to
107 any costs approved by the commission. These costs are to be
108 collected over a limited time period by the competitive
109 transition charge;
110 (25) "Transmission and distribution service", delivery
111 of electricity provided by an electric utility over its
112 transmission and distribution systems;
113 (26) "Utility consolidated bill", an invoicing
114 framework in which a single bill is provided to a retail
115 customer by an electric utility that includes charges for
116 electric supply services and transmission and distribution
117 services.

SB 1411 6
393.2006. 1. An electric utility shall provide equal
and open access to electric supply over the electric
utility's transmission and distribution systems to allow
retail electric suppliers to sell electricity directly to
retail customers in the state.
2. Twenty-four months after August 28, 2026, the
commission shall permit commercial and industrial customers
of electric utilities to choose a retail electric supplier.
3. On a time frame selected by the commission, but no
later than eighteen months following the date at which
commercial and industrial customers are permitted to choose
a retail electric supplier, the commission shall permit
residential customers to choose a retail electric supplier.
Nothing in this section shall adversely affect the ability
of energy assistance residential customers to retain access
to all financial assistance benefits currently available to
qualifying low-income customers, regardless of the retail
customer's choice of supplier of electric supply services.
393.2009. 1. Each electric utility shall submit to
the commission a restructuring plan to assist retail
customers to choose a retail electric supplier for electric
supply services under section 393.2006. The plan shall be
submitted pursuant to a schedule established by the
commission on or before the date that is twelve months prior
to the date when commercial and industrial customers are
able to choose a retail electric supplier.
2. A restructuring plan under this section shall
include, but is not limited to, the following:
(1) Identification of transition costs and an
explanation of mitigation efforts taken by electric
utilities to minimize such costs;

SB 1411 7
(2) Proposed non-bypassable transition charges for
each customer class for the recovery of transition costs;
(3) Proposed unbundled rates for each retail customer
class for generation, transmission, and distribution
services;
(4) A description of the unbundling process, including
an explanation of the steps taken by an electric utility to
ensure that the proposed unbundled rates do not result in
the creation of cross-subsidies that adversely affect
residential customers;
(5) Procedures for ensuring the ability of customers
to choose a retail electric supplier for electric supply
services;
(6) Procedures describing the ability of retail
suppliers to obtain historic usage data, and other relevant
information for pricing, invoicing, and communication
functions with retail customers;
(7) Procedures describing the process for electric
utilities to provide to retail electric suppliers access to
retail customer data necessary for pricing, contracting,
dual billing, utility consolidated billing, and supplier
consolidated billing functions;
(8) Procedures governing the default supply service
supply rates; and
(9) Tariffs and rate schedules implementing each of
the procedures in subdivisions (1) to (8) of this subsection.
3. The commission shall review each restructuring plan
and, after conducting a hearing, issue an order accepting,
modifying, or rejecting the plan no later than six months
from the filing date of the plan. If the commission rejects
the plan, the commission shall state the specific reasons
and order the electric utility to file an alternative plan

SB 1411 8
within thirty days. The commission shall review the
alternative plan and accept comments from interested parties
in a timely manner.
393.2012. 1. Electric utilities shall unbundle the
rates charged for generation, transmission, and distribution
services for all customer classes consistent with the
provisions of sections 393.2006 and 393.2009.
2. Following the implementation of the unbundled rates
under this section, the commission shall regulate the
manufacture, sale, and distribution of electricity pursuant
to the provisions of sections 393.2000 to 393.2036.
393.2015. 1. Each electric utility shall be permitted
to recover transition costs pursuant to the time frame under
section 393.2006 and the divestiture process under section
393.2018.
2. The commission shall approve the recovery and time
periods over which the stranded costs are to be collected by
the competitive transition charge. The commission shall
take into consideration the electric utility's expected rate
of return on the generation assets, the proceeds obtained in
the divestiture process under section 393.2018, and the
effect on a retail customer's electricity costs. The
commission may also consider other criteria deemed
appropriate by the commission in assessing the stranded cost
recovery and the collection period of such costs.
393.2018. 1. At any time prior to and consistent with
the timeline under section 393.2006, electric utilities
shall divest their generation assets. Such generation
assets may be divested in one or both of the following
options with the approval of the commission:
(1) Sell generation assets to an unaffiliated entity
or entities at a fair market value; or

SB 1411 9
(2) Transfer generation assets to a non-utility
affiliate at a fair market value.
2. During and after the divestiture process under this
section, the commission shall determine whether it is
necessary to establish, in addition to existing independent
system operator market power protections that may be
applicable, an independent market monitor to ensure that no
entity owns generation assets in an amount that gives that
entity market power.
393.2021. 1. Consistent with the time frame for
choosing a retail electric supplier pursuant to sections
393.2006 and 393.2009, electric utilities shall provide
default supply service to retail customers that do not
choose a retail electric supplier.
2. Default supply service for large commercial and
industrial customers shall consist of hourly prices for
electric energy, along with any additional costs incurred in
the provision of such services by the independent system
operator.
3. Default supply service for medium commercial and
industrial customers shall commence with a rate set every
six months through a competitive procurement process along
with any additional costs incurred in the provision of such
services by the independent system operator. If at any time
less than seventy percent of the annual megawatt-hour
consumption of such rate class is supplied by the electric
supply established by the competitive procurement process,
the commission shall initiate a proceeding within three
months of when the less than seventy percent threshold was
reached to phase out the electric supply established by the
competitive procurement process and replace it with the
hourly priced default supply service.

SB 1411 10
4. Default supply service for small commercial and
industrial customers shall commence with a rate set annually
through a competitive procurement process along with any
additional costs incurred in the provision of such services
by the independent system operator. If at any time less
than sixty percent of the annual megawatt-hour consumption
of such rate class is supplied by the electric supply
established by the competitive procurement process, the
commission shall initiate a proceeding within three months
of when the less than sixty percent threshold was reached to
phase out the electric supply established by the competitive
procurement process and replace it with the hourly priced
default supply service.
5. Default supply service for residential customers
shall commence with a rate set annually through a
competitive procurement process along with any additional
costs incurred in the provision of such services by the
independent system operator. If at any time less than fifty
percent of the annual megawatt-hour consumption of such rate
class is supplied by the electric supply established by the
competitive procurement process, the commission shall
initiate a proceeding within three months of when the less
than fifty percent threshold was reached to phase out the
electric supply established by the competitive procurement
process and replace it with the hourly priced default supply
service or another default supply service approved by the
commission.
6. The competitive procurement processes under this
section shall consist of a wholesale power auction or
similar competitive process to establish a clearing price or
rate including electric supply, capacity, transmission,
ancillary services, and other services identified by the

SB 1411 11
commission, for the retail customers in each rate class that
do not choose a retail electric supplier. Such auctions
shall occur pursuant to a schedule approved by the
commission consistent with the default supply services under
this section and as frequently as necessary.
7. For each default supply service rate class category
under this section, the retail rate shall also include all
administrative and operational costs, including direct and
indirect costs, that are incurred to provide default supply
service to retail customers.
(1) Direct costs to provide default supply service
shall be fully allocated to the rate for each rate class.
Indirect or shared costs incurred to provide default supply
service shall also be allocated to the rate for each rate
class. Allocation of indirect or shared costs shall be
determined in accordance with the provisions of this chapter
and through a fully allocated cost study performed by the
electric utility and presented to the commission, subject to
stakeholder input. This cost study shall include each and
every cost category that can reasonably be deemed necessary
to provide or support the provision of default supply
service.
(2) Indirect costs to be recovered in the default
supply service rate under this section shall be re-evaluated
at a time period deemed appropriate by the commission but no
later than every six months. A commission-approved tariff
shall be established to administer the cost allocation
mechanism under this section.
8. For each rate class, once an hourly priced default
supply service has been in operation for six months, the
commission shall initiate a proceeding to establish a
process to phase out the default supply service with an

SB 1411 12
alternative electric supply service provided by one or more
retail electric suppliers for the purpose of supplying
retail customers in the rate class who do not choose a
retail electric supplier.
393.2024. 1. The commission may establish a separate
process for the supply of electric supply service for energy
assistance customers in each electric utility service
geographical area. This process shall include the grouping
of the subset of energy assistance residential customers
into an aggregation program.
2. The aggregation of customers to be supplied
electric supply services by a retail supplier shall be
chosen by a competitive bidding process for a term length
established by the commission. The competitive bidding
process may be repeated in advance of the expiration of the
initial term length for the next term.
3. The retail supplier selected in the competitive
bidding process under this section shall offer a price at or
below the default supply service rate set annually through a
competitive procurement process for residential customers
for the same or similar term length. If the electric supply
service chosen by a competitive procurement process for
default supply service is replaced with an hourly default
supply service, the commission may institute an alternative
pricing threshold for purposes of the energy assistance
customer aggregation program under this section.
4. Energy assistance customers shall have the ability
to opt-out of the electric supply service aggregation
program. If the energy assistance customers choose to opt-
out, such customers shall no longer be eligible for any
energy assistance relief.

SB 1411 13
5. The commission shall hold a public hearing
regarding the energy assistance residential customers
aggregation program under this section prior to the
implementation of the aggregation program.
393.2027. 1. All electric utilities shall provide
open and nondiscriminatory access to their data and systems
as needed to retail electric suppliers. All electric
utilities shall continue to provide metering services but
customer-specific data and other relevant customer
information shall be made available to retail electric
suppliers so long as the retail electric suppliers receive a
retail customer's consent for the release of the customer
data.
2. The commission shall develop a process to obtain
customer consent for the release of customer data under this
section. Commonly used digital signatures or similar
methods consistent with the current technological
capabilities shall be sufficient to receive customer consent.
3. Customer data under this section shall include:
(1) At least two years of customer usage and metering
data and other information, including, but not limited to,
customer details, transmission details, or any issues with
transmission, distribution, or billing;
(2) Monthly summaries and hourly interval data, if
available, of customer usage at the kilowatt-hour and
kilowatt measurements.
4. During the time period when a retail customer
receives electric supply from a retail electric supplier,
the electric utility shall make available to the retail
electric supplier customer usage data under subsection 3 of
this section as necessary to facilitate invoicing in a
timely manner.

SB 1411 14
5. Retail customers shall be able to select their
preferred billing method including, but not limited to, a
utility consolidated bill of electric supply services and
delivery service rates, a retail electric supplier
consolidated bill of electric supply services and delivery
service rates, as well as the dual billing option for such
charges.
6. The dual billing option shall be available at the
time commercial and industrial customers choose their retail
supplier for electric supply services pursuant to section
393.2006.
7. The commission shall promulgate rules to develop
the necessary procedures and requirements to implement the
utility consolidated billing and supplier consolidated
billing methods under this section to be available at the
time residential customers choose their retail electric
supplier.
8. Within six months after residential customers
choose a retail electric supplier, electric utilities shall
implement an accelerated switching process where residential
customers may change retail electric suppliers within three
business days after the customers are permitted to choose a
retail electric supplier pursuant to the provision of
section 393.2006. Additionally, residential and small
commercial and industrial customers moving within an
electric utility's geographic service area shall continue to
receive electric supply services from the same retail
electric supplier without being required to switch to a
different retail electric supplier.
9. The commission shall have the authority to
investigate and establish rules for additional programs
designed to improve the retail customer's experience in

SB 1411 15
choosing a retail electric supplier for electric supply
services. Such programs may include, but are not limited
to, net-metering incentives, community solar programs,
customer referrals, and municipal aggregation programs.
393.2030. 1. Six months after August 28, 2026, the
commission shall develop a customer education program to
ensure that all retail customers have access to accurate
information about their ability to choose a retail electric
supplier. The program shall explore ways for the commission
to work with electric utilities and retail electric
suppliers to distribute educational pieces as well as
appropriate cost recovery from all customers to support the
customer education program. The commission may delegate to
the office of retail market development under section
393.2033 some or all of the administrative work required in
the development of the customer education program.
2. To the extent the costs of the customer education
program are known when the restructuring plans under section
393.2009 are submitted to the commission, costs may be
approved for recovery through the non-bypassable competitive
transition charge.
3. The commission shall explore the use of a website
that explains a retail electric supplier's services and
makes comparisons between the electric supply services and
related products being offered by retail electric suppliers.
393.2033. 1. The commission shall establish the
"Office of Retail Market Development and Oversight", to be
funded by an annual assessment of retail electric suppliers
based on a formula to be determined by the commission not to
exceed twenty thousand dollars annually per license under
section 393.2036.

SB 1411 16
(1) The office shall have the authority to seek input
from all interested parties and to develop a thorough
understanding and critical analyses of the tools and
techniques used to promote retail energy competition.
(2) The office shall monitor existing competitive
power market related conditions in the state, identify
barriers to retail competition for all customer classes, and
actively explore and propose to the commission solutions to
overcome identified barriers and enhance the competitive
retail power market.
(3) The office shall publish a report at the request
of the commission, but no less than annually. The report
shall include a number of complaints filed against each
retail electric supplier, steps taken to resolve the
complaints, and any other information deemed relevant by the
office.
(4) The office shall have the authority to address any
violations by a retail electric supplier through an
imposition of a probationary status which may include, but
shall not be limited to, enhanced oversight and additional
reporting requirements.
(5) The office shall submit to the commission any
recommendation for suspension or revocation of a retail
supplier's license if a violation occurred.
(6) The office shall develop and implement a
commission-approved online-training program that requires a
designated representative for each retail electric
supplier. By participating in the program, the designated
representative shall demonstrate a thorough understanding of
the commission's regulations regarding electric supply
services, consumer protection, and any other matter the
commission deems appropriate.

SB 1411 17
(7) At the conclusion of the online-training program
under subdivision (6) of this subsection, the office shall
conduct an online examination and, on a satisfactory score,
certify that the designated representative of the retail
electric supplier has successfully completed the online-
training program in a timely manner.
(8) The office shall determine the schedule and
frequency by which a designated representative of a retail
electric supplier shall complete the training and
certification. The commission shall not issue a license to
a retail electric supplier for the provision of electric
supply service in the state until a designated
representative has completed the online-training program and
received the certification.
2. The office shall make recommendations to the
commission concerning the establishment of guidelines for
the provision of electric supply services to residential
customers that ensure:
(1) Accurate and adequate pricing information through
marketing and disclosure statements;
(2) An understandable format that enables comparing
prices and services on a uniform basis; and
(3) Processes to confirm and document a customer's
intent to switch retail electric suppliers to avoid any
unauthorized switches of retail electric suppliers for
electric supply services.
3. The office, at the discretion of the commission,
may be tasked with some or all of the administrative work
required in the development of the guidelines under
subsection 2 of this section.
393.2036. 1. No person or company shall engage in the
business of electric supply services in this state unless

SB 1411 18
the person or company holds a retail electric supplier
license issued by the commission.
2. The commission shall develop a licensing process to
ensure retail electric suppliers seeking to do business in
the state are capable of providing adequate electric supply
service in the state. The licensing process shall include,
but is not limited to:
(1) An application to gather information as to whether
an applicant has the capacity to provide electric supply
service in the state;
(2) Internal procedures to process the application
under this section no later than ninety days after the
application is submitted;
(3) Establishing reasonable financial requirements to
ensure an applicant is capable of providing electric supply
service in the state;
(4) A licensing fee and a bond or other financial
surety instrument issued by a qualifying financial
institution authorized to do business in the state.
(a) The amount of the licensing fee shall not exceed
ten thousand dollars.
(b) The amount of the surety shall equal five hundred
thousand dollars per retail electric supplier license issued
by the commission.
(c) The financial surety shall be conditioned upon the
full and faithful performance of all duties and obligations
of the applicant as a retail electric supplier and shall be
valid for a period of not less than one year. The cost of
the surety shall be paid by the applicant. The applicant
shall submit a copy of the surety with a notarized
verification page from the issuer together with the
application;

SB 1411 19
(5) Training to ensure the applicant shall comply with
all state laws and commission rules.
3. The commission shall monitor the retail power
market for the supply and distribution of electricity to
retail customers to ensure retail electric suppliers are not
engaged in anticompetitive or discriminatory practices.
(1) If the commission finds that a retail electric
supplier engaged in anticompetitive or discriminatory
practices, the commission shall request the attorney general
to commence a civil action against the retail electric
supplier in a court of competent jurisdiction.
(2) If the court finds that a violation occurred, the
court may impose civil penalties in the amount not to exceed
one hundred thousand dollars per violation, damages,
injunctive relief, attorney fees, and any such other relief
the court finds appropriate.
(3) Any proceedings initiated pursuant to this section
shall be subject to the provisions of sections 386.400 to
386.610 and sections 386.700 to 386.710. Provisions of
sections 393.2000 to 393.2036 that are applicable to
proceedings involving electric utilities shall also apply to
retail electric suppliers.
✓